Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.36
Sell at retail and sale at retail,
defined.

Sell
at retail and sale at retail means sale for use or consumption and not for
resale in any form except as provided in section 53-175.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 44.